Colorado, session 2026A, HB1082.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Children Are Not for Sale Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Residents of Colorado and other states and territories
throughout the United States have seen an alarming increase in human
trafficking, especially human trafficking involving minor children;
(b) Current penalties in Colorado law, with parole eligibility in as
little as 8 years, have failed to adequately deter the human trafficking of
minor children; and
(c) It is the measure of a fair and compassionate society to ensure
that children are not for sale.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-504, amend
(2)(a) and (2)(b); and add (5) as follows:
18-3-504. Human trafficking for sexual servitude - human
trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude.
(2) (a) A person commits human trafficking of a minor for sexual
servitude if the person:
(I) Knowingly sells, recruits, harbors, transports, transfers,
isolates, entices, provides, receives, obtains by any means, maintains, or
makes available a minor for the purpose of commercial sexual activity;
or
-2- HB26-1082

(II) Knowingly advertises, offers to sell, or sells travel services
that facilitate an activity prohibited pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(I) of this
section; OR
(III) TRADES ANYTHING OF MONETARY VALUE TO BUY OR SELL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A MINOR WHO THE PERSON KNOWS IS BEING
TRAFFICKED FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE. IN A CRIMINAL PROSECUTION
BROUGHT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a)(III), IT IS NOT A DEFENSE
THAT THE DEFENDANT DID NOT KNOW THE MINOR'S AGE OR THAT THE
DEFENDANT REASONABLY BELIEVED THE MINOR TO BE EIGHTEEN YEARS
OLD OR OLDER.
(b) Human trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude is a class 2
CLASS 1 felony. The court shall sentence a person convicted of such a
class 2 felony to the department of corrections for a term of at least the
minimum of the presumptive range for a class 2 felony, as set forth in
section 18-1.3-401 HUMAN TRAFFICKING OF A MINOR FOR SEXUAL
SERVITUDE TO LIFE IMPRISONMENT WITHOUT THE POSSIBILITY OF PAROLE.
(5) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE GOVERNOR FROM
ISSUING A PARDON OR CLEMENCY OR FROM COMMUTING A SENTENCE.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-3- HB26-1082

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1082